Missouri, session 2026, HB3033.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 227, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 227.880, to read as follows:
227.880. Shafer Road from its intersection with Highway 63 in Texas County
2 north to its intersection with Highway 63 in Phelps County shall be renamed "State
3 Route 137" and no political subdivision shall designate such roadway otherwise.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.